Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Agricultural College

§ 2321.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(4), eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 2322.
Repealed. 2007, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 6(11).

§ 2323.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(4), eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 2324.
Repealed. 1981, No. 209 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

§ 2324a.
Repealed. 1983, No. 100 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Dec. 31, 1986.

§§ 2325-2327.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(4), eff. May 30, 2013.